South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3336.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Sections 31-21-40, 31-21-50, and 31-21-60 of the S.C. Code are amended to read: Section 31-21-40.  It is unlawful: (1) to refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, to refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of, or otherwise to make unavailable or deny a dwelling to any person because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap or disability, familial status, or national origin, or source of income; (2) to discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with it, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap or disability, familial status, or national origin, or source of income; (3) to make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published, any notice, statement, or advertisement with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, handicap or disability, familial status, or national origin, or source of income or an intention to make the preference, limitation, or discrimination; (4) to represent to any person because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap or disability, familial status, or national origin, or source of income that any dwelling is not available for inspection, sale, or rental when the dwelling is available; (5) for profit, to induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race, color, religion, sex, handicap or disability, familial status, or national origin, source of income; (6) to discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a handicap or disability of: (a) that buyer or renter; (b) a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available; or (c) any person associated with that buyer or renter; (7) to discriminate against a person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with the dwelling, because of a handicap or disability of: (a) that person; (b) a person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available; or (c) any person associated with that person. Section 31-21-50.  It is unlawful to deny any person access to, or membership or participation in, any multiple-listing service, real estate brokers' organization, or other service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings or to discriminate against him in the terms or conditions of the access, membership, or participation on account of race, color, religion, sex, handicap or disability, familial status, or national origin, or source of income. Section 31-21-60.  (A) It is unlawful for any person or other entity whose business includes engaging in residential real estate-related transactions to discriminate against any person in making available such a transaction, or in the terms or conditions of the transaction, because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap or disability, familial status, or national origin, or source of income. (B) As used in this section, "residential real estate-related transaction" means any of the following: (1) the making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial assistance: (a) for purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a dwelling; or (b) secured by residential real estate; (2) the selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property. (C) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person engaged in the business of furnishing appraisals of real property to take into consideration factors other than race, color, religion, national origin, sex, handicap or disability, or familial status, or source of income. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----